North Carolina, session 2025, HB345.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 77 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 11.
"Rights of Certain Human-Impacted River Ecosystems.
"§ 77-145. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the Rights of the Rivers Act.
"§ 77-146. Purpose.
This act recognizes and protects the rights of certain human-impacted river ecosystems and
the right of the people of North Carolina to a healthy, thriving ecosystem for those rivers.
"§ 77-147. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Dan River ecosystem. – The watershed of the Dan River, including both its
mainstem and tributaries, all species and ecosystems found in the watershed,
and species and ecosystems that depend on the watershed.
Page 2 House Bill 345-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Haw River ecosystem. – The watershed of the Haw River, including both its
mainstem and tributaries, all species and ecosystems found in the watershed,
and species and ecosystems that depend on the watershed.
(3) Natural resource management agencies. – The Department of Natural and
Cultural Resources, the Department of Environmental Quality, and the
Wildlife Resources Commission.
(4) River ecosystems protected in this Article. – All of the following:
a. The Dan River ecosystem.
b. The Haw River ecosystem.
"§ 77-148. Rights of human-impacted river ecosystems.
(a) Rights of Human-Impacted River Ecosystems. – The river ecosystems protected in
this Article possess rights, including, but not limited to, all of the following:
(1) The right to naturally exist, flourish, regenerate, and evolve.
(2) The right to full restoration, recovery, and preservation.
(3) The right to abundant, pure, clean, unpolluted water, including the right to
natural surface water flow and recharge and groundwater recharge.
(4) The right to a healthy natural environment and natural biodiversity.
(5) The right to carry on all natural ecosystem functions.
(6) The right to be free of activities, practices, and any other man-made
obstructions that interfere with or infringe upon the rights set forth in this
section.
(b) No Conferral of Obligations. – The rights of river ecosystems protected in this Article
shall not be interpreted to confer liabilities, duties, obligations, or responsibilities on any
particular river ecosystem except as expressly set forth herein.
"§ 77-149. Rights of the people of the State.
All residents of the State possess the right to healthy, flourishing river ecosystems.
"§ 77-150. Rights of indigenous people.
Nothing in this Article shall abrogate the collective or individual rights of indigenous people
residing in the State, including, but not limited to, members of the tribes and bands identified in
Chapter 71A of the General Statutes.
"§ 77-151. Implementation.
The State shall protect the rights secured in this act by providing that natural resource
management agencies of the State take action to ensure these rights are guaranteed and upheld
as specified in this section. This includes all of the following:
(1) Natural resource management agencies shall not conduct, authorize, license,
permit, or fund any public or private activities, practices, or operations that
are inconsistent with, or which will or may violate or infringe upon, the rights
or provisions of this act.
(2) No later than June 30, 2026, natural resource management agencies shall:
a. Review their existing and proposed activities, practices, or operations,
as well as all agency laws, policies, rules, or regulations, to identify
any potential or ongoing violations of the rights or provisions of this
Article.
b. Jointly conduct a complete baseline environmental assessment of the
human-impacted river ecosystems, which shall include identification
of areas within the ecosystems in need of restoration, and prioritization
of those areas.
(3) No later than June 30, 2027, natural resource management agencies shall:
a. Remedy any potential or ongoing violation identified in subdivision
(2) of this section to ensure all existing or proposed policies, rules, or
regulations, or ongoing or proposed activities, practices, or operations,
House Bill 345-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
are made consistent with and protective of the rights and provisions of
this Article.
b. Develop recommendations for remedying any potential or ongoing
violation of law identified in subdivision (2) of this section and submit
a report of those recommendations to the General Assembly.
(4) No later than June 30, 2030, complete full restoration of all areas of river
ecosystems protected in this Article located within the State and identified
through the assessment required by sub-subdivision (2)b. of this section.
"§ 77-152. Civil enforcement.
(a) Enforcement by the State. – The Attorney General is authorized to enforce and defend
these rights by the filing of an action in the courts of this State to enjoin infringements of the
rights set out in this Article and collect damages for impacts to natural resources within river
ecosystems protected in this Article as described in subsection (h) of this section.
(b) Enforcement by the Human-Impacted River Ecosystems. – The river ecosystems
protected in this Article may enforce or defend the rights secured in this act through a legal action
brought in the courts of this State, brought in the name of the human-impacted river ecosystem
as the real party in interest. Remedies shall include injunctive relief to enjoin the activity or
project which violates the rights set forth in this Article.
(c) Right of Intervention. – The river ecosystems protected in this Article may also
intervene in any litigation authorized by this section.
(d) Standing. – Any resident of the State shall have standing to both file an action in the
name of the ecosystem under subsection (b) of this section and to intervene in any litigation in
the name of the ecosystem under subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Enforcement by Individuals. – Any North Carolina resident may enforce or defend
the rights secured in this act through a legal action brought in any appropriate court. Any resident
may also intervene in any litigation concerning this act in order to enforce or defend it. Remedies
shall include injunctive relief to enjoin the activity or project which violates this act.
(f) Enforcement Actions and Burden of Proof. – Where probable violations of the rights
protected in this act are shown to exist, lack of full scientific certainty shall not be used as a
reason for denying or postponing enforcement or defense of these rights. The burden of proving
the absence of a violation of rights shall lie with the persons responsible for the infringement of
rights or impacts to natural resources alleged and not with the party or parties enforcing or
defending the rights protected in this Article.
(g) Civil Penalties. – Any business or government entity that violates any provision of
this Article shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a single
occurrence, or up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) per day of a continuing occurrence, with each
day constituting a separate offense under this Article. These penalties shall be trebled in cases
where the violation is found to be willful.
(h) Damages. – Any business or government entity that violates any provision of this act
shall be liable for any natural resource damages caused to the river ecosystems protected in this
Article as a result of the violation. The measure of damages shall be the cost of fully restoring
the human-impacted river ecosystem to its state prior to the violation and shall be paid to the
State to be used exclusively for the restoration of the ecosystem.
(i) Business and Governmental Entities. – Any business entity which is shown to have
violated any provision of this Article shall be strictly liable and deemed not to possess any of the
rights, privileges, powers, or protections which would interfere with the defense or enforcement
of rights protected in this Article. Any defense of sovereign immunity is expressly waived with
respect to any governmental entity shown to have violated any provision of this Article."
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this
Page 4 House Bill 345-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application and, to this end, the
provisions of this act are severable.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 345-First Edition Page 5